Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1901
Terms, defined.

For
purposes of sections 8-1901 to 8-1903, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance; and

(2) Financial institution means:

(a) A bank, savings bank, building and loan association,
savings and loan association, credit union, or trust company, whether chartered by the department, the United States,
or a foreign state agency;

(b) A subsidiary of a bank holding company or out-of-state bank holding
company; or

(c) A branch of a financial institution described in subdivision (a)
or (b) of this subdivision.

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 17;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 16;

Laws 2012, LB963, § 13.